Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4319
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of the Agricultural Liming Materials Act pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to fineness as defined in section 2-4310 and he or she shall refer in adopting such rules and regulations to specifications used by national testing and materials organizations.

Laws 1981, LB 396, §19;

Laws 1983, LB 539, § 5.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.